Maryland, session 2026, SB0886.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 3–103(m); 3–1601 through 3–1611 and the subtitle “Subtitle 16. Secure
Maryland Wage Act”; and 5–205(p) of Article – Labor and Employment of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, (Three–fifths of all the members
elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be proposed that the Maryland
Constitution read as follows:
Declaration of Rights
ARTICLE 49.

SENATE BILL 886 3
THAT EVERY PERSON, AS A CENTRAL COMPONENT OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHT
TO LIBERTY AND EQUALITY, HAS THE FUNDAMENTAL RIGHT WHILE ENGAGED IN
EMPLOYMENT IN THE STATE TO BE PAID AT A WAGE RATE THAT IS AT LEAST EQUAL
TO THE STATE MINIMUM WAGE RATE SET BY LAW WITHOUT REGARD TO TIPS THAT
THE INDIVIDUAL RECEIVES. THE STATE MAY NOT, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, DENY,
BURDEN, OR ABRIDGE THE RIGHT UNLESS JUSTIFIED BY A COMPELLING STATE
INTEREST ACHIEVED BY THE LEAST RESTRICTIVE MEANS.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 14–1330 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
14–1330.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FOOD SERVICE FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
21–301 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) “SERVICE FEE” MEANS A FEE ADDED BY A FOOD SERVICE
FACILITY TO A CUSTOMER’S TOTAL CHARGE THAT IS SEPARATE FROM:
(I) THE PRICE LISTED ON THE MENU FOR FOOD, DRINKS, OR
MERCHANDISE SOLD BY THE FOOD SERVICE FACILITY; AND
(II) ANY SALES TAX THE FOOD SERVICE FACILITY IS REQUIRED
TO COLLECT.
(B) A FOOD SERVICE FACILITY MAY NOT CHARGE A SERVICE FEE UNLESS
THE FOOD SERVICE FACILITY PROMINENTLY DISCLOSES TO THE CUSTOMER THE

SENATE BILL 886
AMOUNT OR PERCENTAGE RATE OF THE SERVICE FEE:
(1) ON THE MENU; OR
(2) IN A LOCATION THAT IS VISIBLE TO THE CUSTOMER BEFORE THE
CUSTOMER PLACES AN ORDER.
(C) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION BY A FOOD SERVICE FACILITY IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
Article – Labor and Employment
3–102.
(a) In addition to any duties set forth elsewhere, the Commissioner shall:
(1) enforce Subtitle 2 of this title;
(2) carry out Subtitle 3 of this title;
(3) enforce Subtitle 4 of this title;
(4) enforce Subtitle 9 of this title; AND
(5) [enforce Subtitle 16 of this title; and
(6)] enforce a local minimum wage law.
3–103.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Commissioner may conduct
an investigation to determine whether a provision of this title has been violated on the
Commissioner’s own initiative or may require a written complaint.
(e) (7) THE COMMISSIONER MAY INVESTIGATE WHETHER § 3–718 OF
THIS TITLE HAS BEEN VIOLATED ON RECEIPT OF A WRITTEN COMPLAINT OF AN
EMPLOYEE.
[3–403.

SENATE BILL 886 5
This subtitle does not apply to an individual who:
(1) is employed in a capacity that the Commissioner defines, by regulation,
to be administrative, executive, or professional;
(2) is employed in a nonadministrative capacity at an organized camp,
including a resident or day camp;
(3) is under the age of 16 years and is employed no more than 20 hours in
a week;
(4) is employed as an outside salesman;
(5) is compensated on a commission basis;
(6) is a child, parent, spouse, or other member of the immediate family of
the employer;
(7) is employed in a drive–in theater;
(8) is employed as part of the training in a special education program for
emotionally, mentally, or physically handicapped students under a public school system;
(9) is employed by an employer who is engaged in canning, freezing,
packing, or first processing of perishable or seasonal fresh fruits, vegetables, or
horticultural commodities, poultry, or seafood;
(10) engages in the activities of a charitable, educational, nonprofit, or
religious organization if:
(i) the service is provided gratuitously; and
(ii) there is, in fact, no employer–employee relationship;
(11) is employed in a cafe, drive–in, drugstore, restaurant, tavern, or other
similar establishment that:
(i) sells food and drink for consumption on the premises; and
(ii) has an annual gross income of $400,000 or less;
(12) is employed in agriculture if, during each quarter of the preceding
calendar year, the employer used no more than 500 agricultural–worker days;
(13) is engaged principally in the range production of livestock;
(14) is employed as a hand–harvest laborer and is paid on a piece–rate basis

SENATE BILL 886
in an operation that, in the region of employment, has been and customarily and generally
is recognized as having been paid on that basis, if:
(i) the individual:
1. commutes daily from the permanent residence of the
individual to the farm where the individual is employed; and
2. during the preceding calendar year, was employed in
agriculture less than 13 weeks; or
(ii) the individual:
1. is under the age of 17;
2. is employed on the same farm as a parent of the individual
or a person standing in the place of the parent; and
3. is paid at the same rate that an employee who is at least
17 years old is paid on the same farm;
(15) is a covered employee under the Secure Maryland Wage Act; or
(16) (i) has entered into a contract to play baseball at the minor league
level; and
(ii) is compensated in accordance with the terms of a collective
bargaining agreement that expressly states the wages and working conditions of
employees.]
3–413.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “CONSUMER PRICE INDEX” MEANS THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX
FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS FOR THE WASHINGTON–ARLINGTON–ALEXANDRIA,
DC–VA–MD–WV METROPOLITAN AREA OR A SUCCESSOR METROPOLITAN AREA
INDEX PUBLISHED BY THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS.
(3) “Employer” includes a governmental unit.
[(3)] (4) “Small employer” means an employer that employs 14 or fewer
employees.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section and § 3–414 of this subtitle,
each employer shall pay:

SENATE BILL 886 7
(1) to each employee who is subject to both the federal Act and this subtitle,
at least the greater of:
(i) the minimum wage for that employee under the federal Act; or
(ii) the State minimum wage set under subsection (c) of this section;
and
(2) to each other employee who is subject to this subtitle, at least the
greater of:
(i) the highest minimum wage under the federal Act; or
(ii) the State minimum wage set under subsection (c) of this section.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the State
minimum wage rate is:
(i) [for the 12–month period beginning January 1, 2023, $13.25 per
hour; and
(ii)] FOR THE 36–MONTH PERIOD beginning January 1, 2024,
$15.00 per hour;
(II) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027,
$17.00 PER HOUR;
(III) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028,
$20.00 PER HOUR;
(IV) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2029,
$22.50 PER HOUR;
(V) FOR THE 36–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2030,
$25.00 PER HOUR; AND
(VI) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2033,
AND EACH SUBSEQUENT 12–MONTH PERIOD, THE RATE DETERMINED AND
ANNOUNCED BY THE COMMISSIONER UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) The State minimum wage rate for a small employer is:
(i) [for the 12–month period beginning January 1, 2023, $12.80 per
hour; and

SENATE BILL 886
(ii)] FOR THE 36–MONTH PERIOD beginning January 1, 2024,
$15.00 per hour;
(II) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027,
$16.50 PER HOUR;
(III) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028,
$18.00 PER HOUR;
(IV) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2029,
$19.50 PER HOUR;
(V) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2030,
$22.00 PER HOUR;
(VI) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2031,
$23.50 PER HOUR;
(VII) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2032,
$25.00 PER HOUR; AND
(VIII) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2033,
AND EACH SUBSEQUENT 12–MONTH PERIOD, THE RATE DETERMINED AND
ANNOUNCED BY THE COMMISSIONER UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
[(d) An employer may pay an employee a wage that equals a rate of 85% of the
State minimum wage established under this section if the employee is under the age of 18
years.]
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2033, AND EACH SUBSEQUENT
12–MONTH PERIOD, THE STATE MINIMUM WAGE RATE SHALL BE INCREASED BY THE
AMOUNT, ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST CENT, THAT EQUALS THE PRODUCT OF:
(I) THE STATE MINIMUM WAGE RATE IN EFFECT FOR THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD; AND
(II) THE AVERAGE PERCENTAGE GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER
PRICE INDEX FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD, AS
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.

SENATE BILL 886 9
(2) BEGINNING SEPTEMBER 1, 2032, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL DETERMINE AND ANNOUNCE:
(I) THE AVERAGE PERCENT GROWTH, IF ANY, IN THE
CONSUMER PRICE INDEX BASED ON THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH
PERIOD FOR WHICH DATA ARE AVAILABLE ON MARCH 1; AND
(II) THE STATE MINIMUM WAGE RATE THAT WILL BE EFFECTIVE
FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING THE FOLLOWING JANUARY 1.
(3) IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT THERE IS A DECLINE
OR NO GROWTH IN THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX, THE STATE MINIMUM WAGE RATE
SHALL REMAIN THE SAME AS THE RATE THAT WAS IN EFFECT FOR THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD.
3–419.
(a) (1) [Except as provided in § 3–1604(d) of this title, this] THIS section
applies to each employee who:
(i) is engaged in an occupation in which the employee customarily
and regularly receives more than $30 each month in tips;
(ii) has been informed by the employer about the provisions of this
section; and
(iii) has kept all of the tips that the employee received.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1)(iii) of this subsection, this section does
not prohibit the pooling of tips.
(b) Subject to the limitations in this section, an employer may include, as part of
the wage of an employee to whom this section applies:
(1) an amount that the employer sets to represent the tips of the employee;
or
(2) if the employee or representative of the employee satisfies the
Commissioner that the employee received a lesser amount in tips, the lesser amount.
(c) (1) The tip credit amount that the employer may include under subsection
(b) of this section may not exceed the minimum wage established under § 3–413 of this
subtitle for the employee less [$3.63]:
(I) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027,

SENATE BILL 886
$12.00;
(II) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2028,
$13.50;
(III) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2029,
$15.00; AND
(IV) FOR THE 12–MONTH PERIOD BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2030,
$16.50.
(2) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2031, AN EMPLOYER:
(I) MAY NOT INCLUDE A TIP CREDIT AS PART OF THE WAGE OF
AN EMPLOYEE SUBJECT TO THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) SHALL PAY AN EMPLOYEE A WAGE THAT IS AT LEAST EQUAL
TO THE STATE MINIMUM WAGE SET UNDER § 3–413 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED AS PROHIBITING THE
PAYMENT OF TIPS TO EMPLOYEES.
(d) (1) The Commissioner shall adopt regulations, in consultation with payroll
service providers and restaurant industry trade group representatives, to require
restaurant employers that include a tip credit as part of the wage of an employee to provide
tipped employees with a written or electronic wage statement for each pay period that
shows the effective hourly tip rate as derived from employer–paid cash wages plus all
reported tips for tip credit hours worked each workweek of the pay period.
(2) The Commissioner shall provide notification of the tip credit wage
statement regulations on the Department’s website.
3–718.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EMPLOYER” MEANS AN OPERATOR OF A FOOD SERVICE
FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN § 21–301 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(3) “SERVICE FEE” MEANS A FEE ADDED BY AN EMPLOYER TO A
CUSTOMER’S TOTAL CHARGE THAT IS SEPARATE FROM:
(I) THE PRICE LISTED ON THE MENU FOR FOOD, DRINKS, OR

SENATE BILL 886 11
MERCHANDISE SOLD BY THE EMPLOYER; AND
(II) ANY SALES TAX THE EMPLOYER IS REQUIRED TO COLLECT.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND EXCEPT
AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT CHARGE
A SERVICE FEE UNLESS THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE SERVICE FEE IS DISTRIBUTED TO
THE EMPLOYEE WHO DIRECTLY PERFORMS THE SERVICES FOR WHICH THE
CUSTOMER IS PAYING THE SERVICE FEE.
(2) (I) 1. IF A SERVICE FEE IS CHARGED FOR TABLE SERVICE,
THE SERVICE FEE SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE EMPLOYEES WHO DIRECTLY
PROVIDED THE TABLE SERVICE.
2. IF A SERVICE FEE IS CHARGED FOR A BANQUET OR
CATERED EVENT, THE SERVICE FEE SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED EQUALLY TO THE
EMPLOYEES WHO PERFORMED SERVICES AT THE BANQUET OR CATERED EVENT.
(II) A SERVICE FEE MAY NOT BE DISTRIBUTED TO A
SUPERVISORY OR MANAGERIAL EMPLOYEE.
(III) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT INCLUDE A SERVICE FEE
DISTRIBUTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AS PART OF THE WAGE OF AN EMPLOYEE
SUBJECT TO SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) THE SERVICE FEE DISTRIBUTION REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION
MAY BE EXPRESSLY MODIFIED THROUGH A BONA FIDE COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
AGREEMENT FOR PURPOSES OF ESTABLISHING TO WHOM THE SERVICE FEE IS
DISTRIBUTED.
(D) (1) IF AN EMPLOYER VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN
EMPLOYEE OF THE EMPLOYER MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE COMMISSIONER.
(2) IF THE COMMISSIONER RECEIVES A COMPLAINT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL:
(I) TRY TO RESOLVE THE ISSUE INFORMALLY; OR
(II) DETERMINE WHETHER THE EMPLOYER HAS VIOLATED THIS
SECTION.
(3) IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT THE EMPLOYER HAS
VIOLATED THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ISSUE AN ORDER

SENATE BILL 886
COMPELLING COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
5–604.
(b) An employer or other person may not discharge or otherwise discriminate
against an employee because the employee:
(1) files a complaint under or related to this title;
(2) brings an action under this title or a proceeding under or related to this
title or causes the action or proceeding to be brought;
(3) has testified or will testify in an action under this title or a proceeding
under or related to this title; OR
(4) exercises, for the employee or another, a right under this title[; or
(5) is an essential worker who files a complaint or exercises a right under
§ 3–1604 of this article].
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 2 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 2 of this
Act shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the next general election to be
held in November 2026 for adoption or rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution.
(b) (1) At that general election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the
Constitution shall be by ballot, and on each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the
Constitutional Amendment” and “Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now
provided by law.
(2) At that general election, a question substantially similar to the
following shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State:
“Question ____ Constitutional Amendment
The proposed amendment confirms an individual has a fundamental right, while engaged
in employment in the State, to be paid at a wage rate that is at least equal to the State
minimum wage rate without regard to the type of employment or tips the individual
receives and provides that the State may not, directly or indirectly, deny, burden, or abridge

SENATE BILL 886 13
the right unless justified by a compelling State interest achieved by the least restrictive
means.”.
(c) Immediately after the election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of
the vote for and against the proposed amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution, and further proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 1 and 3 of this Act
are contingent on the passage of Section 2 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and its
ratification by the voters of the State.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 6 of this
Act, Sections 1 and 3 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the Governor that
the constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast at the general
election, has been adopted by the people of Maryland.